Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5764.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 115. (1) Subject to subsection (4), a customer of an electric provider may install and use a plug-in photovoltaic system on the customer's meter or service panel and is exempt from the distributed generation program and interconnection requirements under part 5. If a customer installs a plug-in photovoltaic system on a meter or service panel that the customer does not own, the customer must ensure that the installation does not compromise the integrity of the structure at which the meter or service panel is located and must restore the structure when the plug-in photovoltaic system is removed. (2) An electric provider shall not do any of the following regarding a customer that installs and uses a plug-in photovoltaic system: (a) Require the customer to obtain the electric provider's approval before installing or using the system. (b) Collect a fee or other charge related to the installation and use of the system. (c) Require the installation of additional controls or equipment beyond what is already integrated into the system. (3) An electric provider is not liable for any damage or injury caused by a customer's installation and use of a plug-in photovoltaic system under this section. (4) A customer of an electric provider that installs a plug-in photovoltaic system under subsection (1) shall provide notice, on a form and in a manner prescribed by the commission, to the electric provider that provides service to the customer not later than 30 days after the plug-in photovoltaic system is installed. Not later than 120 days after the effective date of this section, the commission shall develop the notice used under this subsection, and the notice must include, but is not limited to, the following information: (a) The customer's service address. (b) The inverter capacity of the system. (c) A statement that the customer is in compliance with the requirements of this section. (5) As used in this section, "plug-in photovoltaic system" or "system" means a moveable photovoltaic generation device or devices that meet all of the following requirements: (i) Has a maximum power output of not more than 1,200 watts. (ii) Is designed to be connected to a building's electrical system through a standard 120 volt alternating current outlet. (iii) Is intended primarily to offset part of the customer's electricity consumption. (iv) Includes a feature that prevents the device from energizing a building's electrical system during a power outage. (v) Meets the standards published in the most recent version of the national electric code published by the National Fire Prevention Association. (vi) Is certified by the Underwriters Laboratories or an equivalent nationally recognized testing laboratory.